src/import/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs

eel+Pref#:eel# SimpleVerbs ;
eel+Pref#:eel# EerVerbs ;
eelis+Pref#:eelis# SimpleVerbs ;
eelis+Pref#:eelis# EerVerbs ;
kaug+Pref#:kaug# SimpleVerbs ;
kaug+Pref#:kaug# EerVerbs ;
kiir+Pref#:kiir# SimpleVerbs ;
kiir+Pref#:kiir# EerVerbs ;
sund+Pref#:sund# SimpleVerbs ;
sund+Pref#:sund# EerVerbs ;
taas+Pref#:taas# SimpleVerbs ;
taas+Pref#:taas# EerVerbs ;
vaeg+Pref#:vaeg# SimpleVerbs ;
vaeg+Pref#:vaeg# EerVerbs ;
ühis+Pref#:ühis# SimpleVerbs ;
ühis+Pref#:ühis# EerVerbs ;
de+Pref#:de# EerVerbs ;
re+Pref#:re# EerVerbs ;
SimpleVerbs ;
EerVerbs ;
